District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.41

Report by courts of nonpayment of judgments.

Whenever any person fails within 30 days to satisfy any judgment, then upon the written request of the judgment creditor or his attorney it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court in which any such judgment is rendered within the District of Columbia to forward to the Mayor immediately upon such request a certificate of facts relative to such judgment, upon a form provided by the Mayor, which said certificate shall be prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 131, ch. 222, § 41
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 957, Pub. L. 85-792, § 11

History

1981 Ed., § 40-441.
1973 Ed., § 40-457.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government